Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-376
Adult Protective
Services Central Registry; established; access; name-change order; treatment.

(1) The department shall establish and maintain an Adult Protective
Services Central Registry which shall contain any substantiated report regarding
a person who has allegedly abused, neglected, or exploited a vulnerable adult.

(2) Upon request, a vulnerable adult who is the subject of
a report or, if the vulnerable adult is legally incapacitated, the guardian
or guardian ad litem of the vulnerable adult and the person who has allegedly abused, neglected, or exploited
the vulnerable adult shall be entitled to receive a copy of all
information contained in the registry pertaining to such report. The department shall not release
data that would be harmful or detrimental to the vulnerable adult or that
would identify or locate a person who, in good faith, made a report or cooperated
in a subsequent investigation unless ordered to do so by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

(3) The department shall establish classifications for all
cases in the registry.

(4) The department shall determine whether a name-change order
received from the clerk of a district court pursuant to section 25-21,271
is for a person on the Adult Protective Services Central Registry and, if
so, shall include the changed name with the former name in the registry and
file or cross-reference the information under both names.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 29;

Laws 2010, LB147, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 14.